dictionaries/sk_SK-ascii.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2230 N 1
SFX 2230 zly horsimi .
SFX 2231 N 1
SFX 2231 zly horsie .
SFX 2232 N 1
SFX 2232 zly horsia .
SFX 2233 N 1
SFX 2233 zly horsej .
SFX 2234 N 1
SFX 2234 zly horsiu .
SFX 2235 N 1
SFX 2235 zly horsou .
SFX 2236 N 1
SFX 2236 zly najhorsi .
SFX 2237 N 1
SFX 2237 zly najhorsieho .
SFX 2238 N 1
SFX 2238 zly najhorsiemu .
SFX 2239 N 1
SFX 2239 zly najhorsom .
SFX 2240 N 1
SFX 2240 zly najhorsim .
SFX 2241 N 1
SFX 2241 zly najhorsich .
SFX 2242 N 1
SFX 2242 zly najhorsimi .
SFX 2243 N 1
SFX 2243 zly najhorsie .
SFX 2244 N 1
SFX 2244 zly najhorsia .
SFX 2245 N 1
SFX 2245 zly najhorsej .
SFX 2246 N 1
SFX 2246 zly najhorsiu .
SFX 2247 N 1
SFX 2247 zly najhorsou .
SFX 2248 Y 1
SFX 2248 t 0 .
PFX 2248 Y 1
PFX 2248 zm zmet .
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 t m .
PFX 2249 Y 1
PFX 2249 zm zme .
SFX 2250 Y 1
SFX 2250 t s .
PFX 2250 Y 1
PFX 2250 zm zme .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 t 0 .
PFX 2251 Y 1
PFX 2251 zm zme .
SFX 2252 Y 1
SFX 2252 t me .
PFX 2252 Y 1
PFX 2252 zm zme .
SFX 2253 Y 1
SFX 2253 0 e .
PFX 2253 Y 1
PFX 2253 zm zme .
SFX 2254 Y 1
SFX 2254 t 0 .
PFX 2254 Y 1
PFX 2254 zn znes .
SFX 2255 Y 1
SFX 2255 0 e .
PFX 2255 Y 1
PFX 2255 zni zn .
SFX 2256 Y 1
SFX 2256 0 e .
PFX 2256 Y 1
PFX 2256 zom zome .
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 0 e .
PFX 2257 Y 1
PFX 2257 zri zr .
SFX 2258 Y 1
SFX 2258 0 e .
PFX 2258 Y 1
PFX 2258 zved zv .
SFX 2259 Y 1
SFX 2259 t 0 .
PFX 2259 Y 1
PFX 2259 zv zved .
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 0 e .
PFX 2260 Y 1
PFX 2260 zvi zv .
SFX 2261 Y 1
SFX 2261 ka iek .
PFX 2261 Y 1
PFX 2261 zv vz .
SFX 2262 N 1
SFX 2262 ava iav .
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 o 0 .
PFX 2263 Y 1
PFX 2263 0 i .
SFX 2264 Y 1
SFX 2264 0 e .
PFX 2264 Y 1
PFX 2264 is pojde .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 t 0 .
PFX 2265 Y 1
PFX 2265 i pojde .
SFX 2266 Y 1
SFX 2266 0 e .
PFX 2266 Y 1
PFX 2266 is chod .
SFX 2267 Y 1
SFX 2267 0 e .
PFX 2267 Y 1
PFX 2267 is pod .
SFX 2268 N 1
SFX 2268 st iel .
SFX 2269 Y 1
SFX 2269 t la .
PFX 2269 Y 1
PFX 2269 i 0 .
SFX 2270 Y 1
SFX 2270 t lo .
PFX 2270 Y 1
PFX 2270 i 0 .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 y 0 .
PFX 2271 Y 1
PFX 2271 c ci .
PFX 2272 N 1
PFX 2272 c ci .
SFX 2273 N 1
SFX 2273 est ti .
SFX 2274 N 1
SFX 2274 est tou .
SFX 2275 N 1
SFX 2275 est tiam .
SFX 2276 N 1
SFX 2276 est tiach .
SFX 2277 N 1
SFX 2277 est tami .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 o ejsie .
PFX 2278 Y 1
PFX 2278 ci c .
SFX 2279 Y 1
SFX 2279 o ejsie .
PFX 2279 Y 1
PFX 2279 ci najc .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 y ejsi .
PFX 2280 Y 1
PFX 2280 ci c .
SFX 2281 Y 1
SFX 2281 y ejsieho .
PFX 2281 Y 1
PFX 2281 ci c .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 y ejsiemu .
PFX 2282 Y 1
PFX 2282 ci c .
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 y ejsom .
PFX 2283 Y 1
PFX 2283 ci c .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 y ejsim .
PFX 2284 Y 1
PFX 2284 ci c .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 y ejsich .
PFX 2285 Y 1
PFX 2285 ci c .
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 y ejsimi .
PFX 2286 Y 1
PFX 2286 ci c .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 y ejsie .
PFX 2287 Y 1
PFX 2287 ci c .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 y ejsia .
PFX 2288 Y 1
PFX 2288 ci c .
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 y ejsej .
PFX 2289 Y 1
PFX 2289 ci c .
SFX 2290 Y 1
SFX 2290 y ejsiu .
PFX 2290 Y 1
PFX 2290 ci c .
SFX 2291 Y 1
SFX 2291 y ejsou .
PFX 2291 Y 1
PFX 2291 ci c .
SFX 2292 Y 1
SFX 2292 y ejsi .
PFX 2292 Y 1
PFX 2292 ci najc .
SFX 2293 Y 1
SFX 2293 y ejsieho .
PFX 2293 Y 1
PFX 2293 ci najc .
SFX 2294 Y 1
SFX 2294 y ejsiemu .
PFX 2294 Y 1
PFX 2294 ci najc .
SFX 2295 Y 1
SFX 2295 y ejsom .
PFX 2295 Y 1
PFX 2295 ci najc .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 y ejsim .
PFX 2296 Y 1
PFX 2296 ci najc .
SFX 2297 Y 1
SFX 2297 y ejsich .
PFX 2297 Y 1
PFX 2297 ci najc .
SFX 2298 Y 1
SFX 2298 y ejsimi .
PFX 2298 Y 1
PFX 2298 ci najc .
SFX 2299 Y 1
SFX 2299 y ejsie .
PFX 2299 Y 1
PFX 2299 ci najc .
SFX 2300 Y 1
SFX 2300 y ejsia .
PFX 2300 Y 1
PFX 2300 ci najc .
SFX 2301 Y 1
SFX 2301 y ejsej .
PFX 2301 Y 1
PFX 2301 ci najc .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 y ejsiu .
PFX 2302 Y 1
PFX 2302 ci najc .
SFX 2303 Y 1
SFX 2303 y ejsou .
PFX 2303 Y 1
PFX 2303 ci najc .
SFX 2304 Y 1
SFX 2304 ovek udia .
PFX 2304 Y 1
PFX 2304 c 0 .
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 ovek udi .
PFX 2305 Y 1
PFX 2305 c 0 .
SFX 2306 Y 1
SFX 2306 ovek udom .
PFX 2306 Y 1
PFX 2306 c 0 .
SFX 2307 N 1
SFX 2307 lovek udoch .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 ovek udmi .
PFX 2308 Y 1
PFX 2308 c 0 .
PFX 2309 N 1
PFX 2309 c coh .
PFX 2310 N 1
PFX 2310 co comu .
PFX 2311 N 1
PFX 2311 co com .
PFX 2312 N 1
PFX 2312 co cim .
SFX 2313 N 1
SFX 2313 si musi .
SFX 2314 Y 1
SFX 2314 a 0 .
PFX 2314 Y 1
PFX 2314 cr cri .
SFX 2315 N 1
SFX 2315 ry ier .
PFX 2316 N 1
PFX 2316 ci cie .
PFX 2317 N 1
PFX 2317 ci cich .
PFX 2318 N 1
PFX 2318 ci cim .
PFX 2319 N 1
PFX 2319 c cim .
PFX 2320 N 1
PFX 2320 ci cia .
PFX 2321 N 1
PFX 2321 ci cej .
PFX 2322 N 1
PFX 2322 ci ciu .
PFX 2323 N 1
PFX 2323 ci cou .
PFX 2324 N 1
PFX 2324 ci cieho .
PFX 2325 N 1
PFX 2325 ci ciemu .
PFX 2326 N 1
PFX 2326 ci com .
SFX 2327 N 1
SFX 2327 si esi .
SFX 2328 N 1
SFX 2328 si asi .
SFX 2329 N 1
SFX 2329 si usi .
SFX 2330 N 1
SFX 2330 si ehosi .
SFX 2331 N 1
SFX 2331 si emusi .
SFX 2332 N 1
SFX 2332 ze ehoze .
SFX 2333 N 1
SFX 2333 ze emuze .
SFX 2334 N 1
SFX 2334 ze eze .
SFX 2335 N 1
SFX 2335 ze aze .
SFX 2336 N 1
SFX 2336 ze uze .
SFX 2337 N 1
SFX 2337 ko j .
SFX 2338 Y 1
SFX 2338 ko j .
PFX 2338 Y 1
PFX 2338 0 naj .
SFX 2339 N 1
SFX 2339 eko iek .
SFX 2340 N 1
SFX 2340 via m .
SFX 2341 N 1
SFX 2341 via ch .
SFX 2342 N 1
SFX 2342 ovia ami .
SFX 2343 N 1
SFX 2343 a iev .
SFX 2344 Y 1
SFX 2344 y 0 .
PFX 2344 Y 1
PFX 2344 s si .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 0 ich .
PFX 2345 Y 1
PFX 2345 s si .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 im .
PFX 2346 Y 1
PFX 2346 s si .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 0 imi .
PFX 2347 Y 1
PFX 2347 s si .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 i .
PFX 2348 Y 1
PFX 2348 s si .
SFX 2349 N 1
SFX 2349 ev va .
SFX 2350 N 1
SFX 2350 ev vu .
SFX 2351 N 1
SFX 2351 ev ve .
SFX 2352 N 1
SFX 2352 ev vom .
SFX 2353 N 1
SFX 2353 ev vy .
SFX 2354 N 1
SFX 2354 ev vov .
SFX 2355 N 1
SFX 2355 ev voch .
SFX 2356 N 1
SFX 2356 vec evca .
SFX 2357 N 1
SFX 2357 vec evcovi .
SFX 2358 N 1
SFX 2358 vec evcom .
SFX 2359 N 1
SFX 2359 vec evci .
SFX 2360 N 1
SFX 2360 vec evcov .
SFX 2361 N 1
SFX 2361 vec evcoch .
SFX 2362 N 1
SFX 2362 vec evcami .
SFX 2363 Y 1
SFX 2363 a 0 .
PFX 2363 Y 1
PFX 2363 sl sli .
SFX 2364 N 1
SFX 2364 apa iap .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 a 0 .
PFX 2365 Y 1
PFX 2365 z zi .
SFX 2366 N 1
SFX 2366 ezo iez .
SFX 2367 N 1
SFX 2367 re er .
SFX 2368 N 1
SFX 2368 re ier .
SFX 2369 N 1
SFX 2369 nec enca .
SFX 2370 N 1
SFX 2370 nec encovi .
SFX 2371 N 1
SFX 2371 nec encom .
SFX 2372 N 1
SFX 2372 nec enci .
SFX 2373 N 1
SFX 2373 nec encov .
SFX 2374 N 1
SFX 2374 nec encoch .
SFX 2375 N 1
SFX 2375 nec encami .
SFX 2376 N 1
SFX 2376 aza iaz .
